src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
## Der begin
*  **+Der**  In front of every derivation to make it
possible to target derivations as a class e.g. in regular expressions etc
*  **+Der/Poss**  possessive noun ава » аванне
*  **+Der/Ord**  
*  **+Der/Iter**  весть, кафксть, колмоксть...
*  **+Der/Wife**  Added to male names, surnames, patronymics

## DECLARING DEVERBAL DERIVATIONS OF VERBS
* +Der/kshnO  verb2verb derivation
* +Der/OkshnOms  verb2verb derivation
* +Der/OvOms  verb2verb derivation
* +Der/Ozevems  verb2verb derivation
* +Der/OvkshnOms  verb2verb derivation
* +Der/OvtOms  verb2verb derivation

 +Der/Dimin	 diminutive markers in ня and кя seem to be subject of complementary distribution
* +Der/NJ Онь
* +Der/Bachk * бачк

# Tags for originating language

The following tags are used to guide conversion to IPA: loan words
and foreign names are usually pronounced (approximately) as in the
originating (majority) language. Instead of trying to identify the
correct pronunciation based on phonotactics (orthotactics actually),
we tag all words that can't be correctly transcribed using the SME
transcriber with source language codes. Once tagged, it is possible
to split the lexical transducer in smaller ones according to langu-
age, and apply different IPA conversion to each of them.
The principle of tagging is that we only tag to the extent needed,
and following a priority:
1. any untagged word is pronounced with SME orthographic conventions
1. NNO and NOB have identical pronunciation, NNO is only used if
different in spelling from NOB
1. SWE has mostly the same pronunciation as NOB, and is only used
if different in spelling from NOB
1. Occasionally even SME (the default) may be tagged, to block other
languages from being specified, mainly during semi-automatic
language tagging sessions
All in all, we want to get as much correctly transcribed to IPA
with as little work as possible. On the other hand, if more words
are tagged than strictly needed, this should pose no problem as
long as the IPA conversion is correct - at least some words will
get the same pronunciation whether read as SME or NOB/NNO/SWE.

* **+OLang/CHV** = Chuvash
* **+OLang/MDF** = Moksha
* **+OLang/MYV** = Erzya
* **+OLang/RUS** = Russian
* **+OLang/TAT** = Tatar

Morphophonology
To represent phonologic variations in word forms we use the following
symbols in the lexicon files:
 %{ИЫЙ%}	 phasing out Ы2, eg кундамс:кундай
 %{ЕОØ%}	 morphemes requiring a preceding vowel; also пинге
 %{ЕО%} 	 сельме
 %{ЕØ%}	 кече
 %{АЯ%} 	 А2 in кундамс:кундан
 %{ВИУ%}         lative
 %{Х%}		 This usually precedes the plural marker
 %{КТ%}		 used in imperative and connegative
 %{ЬØ%}	 after imperative Sg2
 %{DIM%}	 This will be for diminutive initial consonant

2016-03-12
%^А2О		 used with final а in пула 

 А2 	 А2:а А2:я
 %{вгк%} 	 %{вгк%}:г %{вгк%}:в %{вгк%}:к
 %{гк%}	 clitic in ``` %{гк%} %{АЕ%} ```
 К1 	 К1:к К1:т
%{АЕØ%}	  ConNeg with ашень, тят, афоль
%{АО%}	  пула stem
%{АОØ%}	  офта stem
%{АЕ%}	 prolative
 Х1 	 Х1:х Х1:0
 Ь2 	 Ь2:ь Ь2:0
%{ъØ%}         This will represent schwa in first syllable

in ped realized as hard sign

And following triggers to control variation
* %^RmVow 	 for removing vowels
%^Ь2ZERO	 removes soft sign before vowel or other combination
%^ЬKEEP		 retains soft sign, breaks pattern for removal шяярьня
%^Ъ2PED		 brings out hard sign, which is otherwise automatically removed
%^Е2О		 Change stem-final vowel сембе:сембось
%^Е2А		 Change stem-final vowel мельге:мельганза
%^Я2А		 Change stem-final vowel рьвя:рьванц
%^А2Е		 Change stem-final vowel мокша:мокшесь
%^Е2Я		 Change word-final vowel for dialect тувотне > тувотня
%^Devoice	 for devoicing изь:исть
%^PXSG1		 кядне, ярмаконе не vs %{ЕОØ%}не
%^CnsSt		 улемс:уль%^CnsSt%>%{АЕØ%}	
%^Glide		 Толстой:Толстой%^Glide%>нь

## Flag diacritics
We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:
|  @P.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @D.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @C.NeedNoun@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised

For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
do no harm.
|  @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@ | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
|  @D.CmpPref.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
|  @P.CmpPref.FALSE@ | Block these words from making further compounds
|  @D.CmpLast.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering R
|  @D.CmpNone.TRUE@ | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
|  @U.CmpNone.FALSE@ | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
|  @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
|  @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@ | Disallow words coming directly from root.

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.
|  @U.Cap.Obl@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  @U.Cap.Opt@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

* **+Use/TTS** – **only** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser
* **+Use/-TTS** – **never** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser

@D.CONJ-MX.IND@ 	 2012-11-04 should this be **D** or **N**

# FLAGS USED WITH MODIFIERS WITHOUT NOUNS

# FLAGS USED WITH COLLECTIVE NOUNS
## number
* @U.DECL-NX.SG@
* @U.DECL-NX.SP@
* @U.DECL-NX.PL@
* @R.DECL-NX.SG@
* @R.DECL-NX.SP@
* @R.DECL-NX.PL@
* @C.DECL-NX@ needed for ellipsis NP heads, i.e., secondary declension

* @U.CX.ABE@ 
* @U.CX.ABL@ 
* @U.CX.CAU@ 
* @U.CX.CMP@ шка
* @U.CX.COM@ 
* @U.CX.DAT@ 
* @U.CX.ELA@ 
* @U.CX.GEN@ 
* @U.CX.GER-ZJ@ these are converbs in complementary distr
* @U.CX.GER-MOK@ these are converbs in complementary distr
* @U.CX.ILL@ 
* @U.CX.INE@ 
* @U.CX.LAT@ 
* @U.CX.LOC@ 
* @U.CX.NOM@ 
* @U.CX.PRL@ 
* @U.CX.TRA@ 
* @U.CX.PRL@ 
* @U.CX.TEMP@ 
* @C.CX@ needed for ellipsis NP heads, i.e., secondary	declension

* @U.DECL-DX.DEF@ 
* @U.DECL-DX.INDEF@ 
* @U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@ 
* @U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@ 
* @U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@ 
* @U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@ 
* @U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@ 
* @U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@ 
* @C.DECL-DX@ needed for ellipsis NP heads, i.e., secondary	declension

| Flag diacritic | Explanation
| :------------- |:-----------
| @U.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;

The word forms in Moksha language start from the lexeme roots of basic
word classes, or optionally from prefixes:
These have been slightly modified from kpv and myv
These words should only include 100% matches with lang-rus N+Sg+Nom

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-mdf/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
